Hawaii statutes.
§708-852 Forgery in the second degree.
(1) A person commits the offense of forgery in the second degree if, with
intent to defraud, the person falsely makes, completes, endorses, or alters a
written instrument, or utters a forged instrument, or fraudulently encodes the
magnetic ink character recognition numbers, which is or purports to be, or
which is calculated to become or to represent if completed, a deed, will,
codicil, contract, assignment, commercial instrument, or other instrument which
does or may evidence, create, transfer, terminate, or otherwise affect a legal
right, interest, obligation, or status.

(2) Forgery in the second degree is a class C
felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1988, c 155, §3; gen ch 1992; am L 1997, c
243, §3]

Case Notes

Charges in indictment held sufficient though inarticulately
drawn. 55 H. 621, 525 P.2d 571 (1974).

There was substantial evidence which a reasonable mind might
accept as adequate to convict defendant. 79 H. 175 (App.), 900 P.2d 172 (1995).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next